Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1570
Discovery of property of debtor; examination; witnesses.

Witnesses may be required, upon the order of the judge or by a subpoena issued by the clerk of the court, to appear and testify upon any proceedings under sections 25-1564 to 25-1580 in the same manner as upon the trial of an issue.

R.S.1867, Code § 539, p. 488;

R.S.1913, § 8118;

C.S.1922, § 9054;

C.S.1929, § 20-1572;

R.S.1943, § 25-1570;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 12.

Witnesses may be required to appear and testify in the same manner as upon the trial of an issue. Orchard & Wilhelm Co. v. North, 125 Neb. 723, 251 N.W. 895 (1933).